src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
|              Flag diacritic | Explanation
|              :------------- |:-----------
|  @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

# Lexicon Root
This is the beginning of everything. The **Root** lexicon is reserved in the
LexC language, and must be the first lexicon defined.

Here is the list of top-level lexica in the South Sámi analyser:

- `Abbreviation ;`
- `Acronym ;`
- `Adjective ;`
- `Adposition ;`
- `Adverb ;`
- `Conjunction ;`
- `Interjection ;`
- `NounRoot ;`
- `Numeral ;`
- `Particle ;`
- `Prefixes ;`
- `Pronoun ;`
- `ProperNoun ;`
- `Punctuation ;`
- `Subjunction ;`
- `Symbols ;`
- `Verb ;`
- `NounAdjAdv ;`

# Lexicon ENDLEX
And this is the ENDLEX of everything:
```
@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@@D.NeedNoun.ON@ ENDLEX2 ;
```
The `@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@` flag diacritic is ued to disallow words tagged
with +CmpNP/Only to end here.
The `@D.NeedNoun.ON@` flag diacritic is used to block illegal compounds.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
